Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
71-6910
Sections; how construed; intent.

(1)
Nothing in sections 71-6901 to 71-6911 shall be construed as creating or recognizing
a right to abortion.

(2)
It is not the intent of sections 71-6901 to 71-6911 to make lawful an abortion
that is currently unlawful.

Laws 2011, LB690, § 14.